Nebraska statutes.
Revised Statutes Cumulative Supplement, 202677-1502
Board; protests; form; report; notification.

(1) The county board of equalization shall meet for the purpose of reviewing and deciding written protests filed pursuant to this section beginning on or after June 1 and ending on or before July 25 of each year. Protests regarding real property shall be signed and filed after the county assessor's completion of the real property assessment roll required by section 77-1315 and on or before June 30. For protests of real property, a protest shall be filed for each parcel. Protests regarding taxable tangible personal property returns filed pursuant to section 77-1229 from January 1 through May 1 shall be signed and filed on or before June 30. The county board in a county with a population of more than one hundred thousand inhabitants based upon the most recent federal decennial census may adopt a resolution to extend the deadline for hearing protests from July 25 to August 10. The resolution must be adopted before July 25 and it will affect the time for hearing protests for that year only. By adopting such resolution, such county waives any right to petition the Tax Equalization and Review Commission for adjustment of a class or subclass of real property under section 77-1504.01 for that year.

(2) Each protest shall be made on a form prescribed by the Tax Commissioner, signed, and filed with the county clerk of the county where the property is assessed. It shall be acceptable for a county to create its own form, including an electronic form, as long as the form captures the information required by this subsection. The protest shall contain or have attached a statement of the reason or reasons why the requested change should be made, including the requested valuation, documentation sufficient for the county board of equalization to determine a different valuation, and a description of the property to which the protest applies. If the property is real property, a description adequate to identify each parcel shall be provided. If the property is tangible personal property, a physical description of the property under protest shall be provided. If the protest does not contain or have attached the statement of the reason or reasons for the protest, including the requested valuation, documentation sufficient for the county board of equalization to determine a different valuation, and the applicable description of the property, the protest shall be dismissed by the county board of equalization. Counties may make reasonable efforts to contact protesters who have timely filed a protest but have either filed incomplete information or not used the required form. The protest shall also indicate whether the person signing the protest is an owner of the property or a person authorized to protest on behalf of the owner. If the person signing the protest is a person authorized to protest on behalf of the owner, such person shall provide the authorization with the protest. If the person signing the protest is not an owner of the property or a person authorized to protest on behalf of the owner, the county clerk shall mail a copy of the protest to the owner of the property at the address to which the property tax statements are mailed.

(3) In counties with a population of at least one hundred thousand inhabitants according to the most recent federal decennial census, for a protest regarding real property, each protester shall be afforded the opportunity to meet in person with the county board of equalization or a referee appointed under section 77-1502.01 to provide information relevant to the protested property value.

(4) No hearing of the county board of equalization on a protest filed under this section shall be held before a single commissioner or supervisor.

(5) The county clerk or county assessor shall prepare a separate report on each protest. The report shall include (a) a description adequate to identify the real property or a physical description of the tangible personal property to which the protest applies, (b) any recommendation of the county assessor for action on the protest, (c) if a referee is used, the recommendation of the referee, (d) the date the county board of equalization heard the protest, (e) the decision made by the county board of equalization, (f) the date of the decision, and (g) the date notice of the decision was mailed to the protester. The report shall contain, or have attached to it, a statement, signed by the chairperson of the county board of equalization, describing the basis upon which the board's decision was made. The report shall have attached to it a copy of that portion of the property record file which substantiates calculation of the protested value unless the county assessor certifies to the county board of equalization that a copy is maintained in either electronic or paper form in his or her office. One copy of the report, if prepared by the county clerk, shall be given to the county assessor on or before August 2. The county assessor shall have no authority to make a change in the assessment rolls until there is in his or her possession a report which has been completed in the manner specified in this section. If the county assessor deems a report submitted by the county clerk incomplete, the county assessor shall return the same to the county clerk for proper preparation.

(6) On or before August 2, or on or before August 18 in a county that has adopted a resolution to extend the deadline for hearing protests, the county clerk shall mail to the protester written notice of the board's decision. The notice shall contain a statement advising the protester that a report of the board's decision is available at the county clerk's or county assessor's office, whichever is appropriate. If the protester is not an owner of the property involved in the protest or a person authorized to protest on behalf of the owner, the county clerk shall also mail written notice of the board's decision to the owner of such property at the address to which the property tax statements are mailed.

Laws 1903, c. 73, § 121, p. 428;

Laws 1905, c. 112, § 1, p. 515;

Laws 1909, c. 112, § 1, p. 444;

Laws 1911, c. 104, § 14, p. 379;

R.S.1913, § 6437;

C.S.1922, § 5972;

C.S.1929, § 77-1702;

R.S.1943, § 77-1502;

Laws 1947, c. 251, § 36, p. 826;

Laws 1949, c. 233, § 1, p. 644;

Laws 1953, c. 274, § 1, p. 899;

Laws 1959, c. 355, § 25, p. 1267;

Laws 1959, c. 371, § 1, p. 1307;

Laws 1961, c. 377, § 6, p. 1158;

Laws 1961, c. 384, § 1, p. 1177;

Laws 1972, LB 1342, § 1;

Laws 1975, LB 312, § 1;

Laws 1984, LB 660, § 2;

Laws 1986, LB 174, § 1;

Laws 1986, LB 817, § 13;

Laws 1987, LB 508, § 44;

Laws 1992, LB 1063, § 124;

Laws 1992, Second Spec. Sess., LB 1, § 97;

Laws 1994, LB 902, § 21;

Laws 1995, LB 452, § 23;

Laws 1995, LB 490, § 147;

Laws 1997, LB 270, § 86;

Laws 2003, LB 292, § 12;

Laws 2004, LB 973, § 33;

Laws 2005, LB 283, § 2;

Laws 2005, LB 299, § 1;

Laws 2006, LB 808, § 37;

Laws 2008, LB965, § 15;

Laws 2009, LB166, § 15;

Laws 2010, LB877, § 4;

Laws 2011, LB384, § 14;

Laws 2018, LB885, § 1;

Laws 2021, LB291, § 1;

Laws 2026, LB803, § 15;

Laws 2026, LB834, § 18.
The Revisor of Statutes has pursuant to section 49-769 correlated LB803, section 15, with LB834, section 18, to reflect all amendments.Changes made by LB803 became operative January 1, 2027. Changes made by LB834 became effective July 18, 2026.
1. Time of meeting

2. Power of county board

3. Miscellaneous

1. Time of meeting

Power of county board of equalization to rectify returns and change assessments is limited to a set number of circumscribed days each year. John Day Co. v. Douglas Cty. Bd. of Equal., 243 Neb. 24, 497 N.W.2d 65 (1993).

When a county board of equalization exercises its direct authority under this section to add omitted property or to increase the assessment of undervalued property, the April 1 notice deadline under section 77-1315 is not applicable, and the board may meet at any time. This section contains no requirement for a hearing when a county board of equalization equalizes assessments of omitted or undervalued property, and due process is satisfied by the de novo review and opportunity to offer evidence available upon review by the district court. Farmers Co-op Assn. v. Boone County, 213 Neb. 763, 332 N.W.2d 32 (1983).

County board of equalization may meet at any time to equalize assessments of omitted or undervalued property. Peter Kiewit Sons' Co. v. County of Douglas, 161 Neb. 93, 72 N.W.2d 415 (1955); Ewert Implement Co. v. Board of Equalization, 160 Neb. 445, 70 N.W.2d 397 (1955).

Meeting date of county board of equalization is fixed by statute. Gamboni v. County of Otoe, 159 Neb. 417, 67 N.W.2d 489 (1954).

Session of county board of equalization is continuous during period specified. Fromkin v. State, 158 Neb. 377, 63 N.W.2d 332 (1954).

2. Power of county board

When a protest of property valuation is not timely filed on or before June 30 as required under subsection (1) of this section, the county board of equalization lacks statutory authority to review and decide the merits of the protest, and it does not have statutory authority to do anything other than dismiss the protest. Mid America Agri Prods. v. Perkins Cty. Bd. Of Equal., 312 Neb. 341, 979 N.W.2d 95 (2022).

Where a protest of property valuation failed to contain or have attached the statement of the reason or reasons for the protest, the county board of equalization lacked authority to do anything other than dismiss the protest. Village at North Platte v. Lincoln Cty. Bd. of Equal., 292 Neb. 533, 873 N.W.2d 201 (2016).

A property owner's exclusive remedy for relief from overvaluation of property for tax purposes is by protest to the county board of equalization, and appeal therefrom to the district court. Olson v. County of Dakota, 224 Neb. 516, 398 N.W.2d 727 (1987).

The county board of equalization has never been given authority to impose or waive penalties. Bachus v. Swanson, 179 Neb. 1, 136 N.W.2d 189 (1965).

There is an omission to return property for taxation where a person reports property but does not list it for taxation. Peter Kiewit Sons', Inc. v. County of Douglas, 172 Neb. 710, 111 N.W.2d 734 (1961).

Assessment by county board of equalization should not be disturbed on appeal unless clearly erroneous. LeDioyt v. County of Keith, 161 Neb. 615, 74 N.W.2d 455 (1956).

Power of board to equalize is limited to time of sitting as board of equalization. Sumner & Co. v. Colfax County, 14 Neb. 524, 16 N.W. 756 (1883).

3. Miscellaneous

A property valuation protest that specified the assessed and requested valuation amounts but stated no reason for the requested change did not comply with the statutory requirement that the protest "contain or have attached a statement of the reason or reasons why the requested change should be made." Village at North Platte v. Lincoln Cty. Bd. of Equal., 292 Neb. 533, 873 N.W.2d 201 (2016).

This section and section 77-1510 do not control a taxpayer's appeal from a decision of a county board of equalization to the Tax Equalization and Review Commission when a county assessor changes a taxpayer's reported valuation of personal property to conform to net book value. Prime Alliance Bank v. Lincoln Cty. Bd. of Equal., 283 Neb. 732, 811 N.W.2d 690 (2012).

Failure by the county clerk to give notice to the taxpayer in strict accordance with this section is fatal to the tax levied on the increase in valuation of the property. Falotico v. Grant Cty. Bd. of Equal., 262 Neb. 292, 631 N.W.2d 492 (2001).

A taxpayer who has not first filed a protest with the county board of equalization may not appeal to the district court a claimed overassessment of his or her own property. JEMCO, Inc. v. Board of Equal. of Box Butte Cty., 242 Neb. 361, 495 N.W.2d 44 (1993).

This section and section 77-1504 were not repealed by section 77-1358. Banner County v. State Bd. of Equal., 226 Neb. 236, 411 N.W.2d 35 (1987).

For protests of real property to a county board of equalization, a protest shall be filed for each parcel. Widtfeldt v. Tax Equal. & Rev. Comm., 15 Neb. App. 410, 728 N.W.2d 295 (2007).

Although the county board's procedures for holding protest hearings pursuant to this section were found unreasonable and arbitrary in this case, the court failed to set forth a blanket condemnation of the board's regular protest and hearing procedures in general. J.C. Penney Co., Inc. v. Lancaster Cty. Bd. of Equal., 6 Neb. App. 838, 578 N.W.2d 465 (1998).